Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 2. State Police Officers’ Retirement System.
§ 51.1-208.
Post-retirement supplements.

In computing the amount of any post-retirement supplements, any additional allowances being paid under the provisions of subsection B of §

51.1-206

shall be disregarded.
Any recipient of an allowance which initially commenced on or prior to January 1, 1990, shall be entitled to post-retirement supplements effective July 1, 1991.

History.

1970, c. 657, § 51-157.1; 1989, c. 484; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 719.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 484, cl. 3 provides that benefits payable upon the retirement or death of a member prior to July 1, 1990, shall be determined under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 51 of the Code of Virginia as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

§ 51.1-209.
Disability as the result of felonious misconduct of another.

Any member in service who is totally and permanently disabled while on active duty as the result of the felonious misconduct of another may retire for disability as provided in subsection B of §

51.1-156

and shall be entitled to maintenance and services at or under the supervision of the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center without being liable to pay for the same.

History.

1990, c. 832; 2015, c. 542.

Cross references.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 2 provides: “That any member of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System who was totally and permanently disabled while on active duty as a result of the felonious misconduct of another, who was not less than thirty years of age, who had been in service not less than seven years, and whose disability occurred after January 1, 1960, shall be entitled to maintenance and services at or under the supervision of the Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation Center without being liable to pay for the same.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation.”

§ 51.1-210.
Disability benefit.

Any member in service who (i) is credited with at least twenty years of service in a hazardous duty position and (ii) meets the (a) requirements for a disability retirement allowance under §

51.1-156

and (b) minimum age requirements of §

51.1-205

may elect to receive the higher of the disability retirement allowance payable under Article 9 (§

51.1-152

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of this title or the service retirement allowance payable under §

51.1-206

less any reduction in allowance required by subsection C of §

51.1-157

or §

51.1-158

.

History.

1997, c. 889.